Colorado, session 2026A, HB1149.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
Shading denotes HOUSE amendment. Double underlining denotes SENATE amendment.
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material to be added to existing law.
Dashes through the words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law.

SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 2-2-315.5 as
follows:
2-2-315.5. Witnesses testimony before committee - oath and
affirmation required - definitions.
(1) BEFORE TESTIFYING BEFORE A COMMITTEE OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY, A PERSON SHALL TAKE THE FOLLOWING OATH:
"THE TESTIMONY I WILL PROVIDE TO THIS LEGISLATIVE
COMMITTEE IS TRUE AND ACCURATE TO THE BEST OF MY
KNOWLEDGE. I UNDERSTAND THAT KNOWINGLY MAKING A
MATERIALLY FALSE STATEMENT DURING TESTIMONY MAY
CONSTITUTE PERJURY IN THE FIRST DEGREE AND MAY
RESULT IN CRIMINAL PROSECUTION."
(2) BEFORE A PERSON TESTIFIES BEFORE A COMMITTEE, THE CHAIR
OF THE COMMITTEE SHALL ADMINISTER THE OATH DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION TO THE PERSON.
(3) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(a) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WHO SPEAKS AT A
COMMITTEE MEETING, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE MEMBER OF THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY IS A MEMBER OF THE COMMITTEE, AND NOTHING IN
THIS SECTION INFRINGES ON A MEMBER'S SPEECH THAT IS PROTECTED BY
THE SPEECH-OR-DEBATE CLAUSE, SECTION 16 OF ARTICLE V OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION;
(b) AN EMPLOYEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, THE
SENATE, OR A LEGISLATIVE SERVICE AGENCY, TESTIFYING OR OTHERWISE
PRESENTING TO A COMMITTEE WITHIN THE SCOPE OF THE EMPLOYEE'S
DUTIES; OR
(c) A PERSON PRESENTING OR TESTIFYING TO A COMMITTEE UNDER
-2- HB26-1149

CIRCUMSTANCES IN WHICH THE COMMITTEE'S REGULAR PRACTICE DOES
NOT REQUIRE THE PERSON TO SIGN UP BEFORE PRESENTING OR TESTIFYING
TO THE COMMITTEE, INCLUDING A REPRESENTATIVE OF A DEPARTMENT
PRESENTING TO A COMMITTEE AS PART OF THE DEPARTMENT'S
PRESENTATION DURING ITS "SMART ACT" HEARING REQUIRED BY
SECTION 2-7-203 OR PRESENTING TO THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE AS
PART OF A BUDGET HEARING.
(4) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "COMMITTEE" MEANS A COMMITTEE COMPRISED SOLELY OF
MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT TAKES PUBLIC TESTIMONY,
INCLUDING A COMMITTEE THAT IS ESTABLISHED IN STATE LAW OR BY A
RULE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OR SENATE OR JOINT RULE OF
THE SENATE AND HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OR AN INTERIM COMMITTEE
CREATED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-3-303.3.
(b) "LEGISLATIVE SERVICE AGENCY" MEANS THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL STAFF, OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE LEGAL SERVICES, OFFICE OF THE
STATE AUDITOR, OR STAFF OF THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
-3- HB26-1149

November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- HB26-1149